Utah statutes.
75-5-306.   Termination of guardianship for incapacitated person.

The authority and responsibility of a guardian for an incapacitated person terminates upon the death of the guardian or ward, the determination of incapacity of the guardian, or upon removal or resignation as provided in Section 75-5-307. Resignation of a guardian does not terminate the guardianship until it has been approved by the court. Testamentary appointment under an informally probated will terminates if the will is later denied probate in a formal proceeding. Termination does not affect his liability for prior acts nor his obligation to account for funds and assets of his ward.



Amended by Chapter 194, 1977 General Session

